Idaho, session 2025, S1183.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 18, Title 61, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 18
WILDFIRE STANDARD OF CARE ACT
61-1801. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Wildfire Standard of Care Act."
61-1802. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. In enacting this chapter, it is the in-
tent of the legislature to provide for the safe, efficient, and reliable
generation, transmission, and distribution of electric power at affordable
rates and in such ways that protect the public interest, health, safety, and
welfare. The legislature recognizes that the public utilities commission
oversees electric corporation compliance with applicable Idaho statutes
and regulations, and, when applicable, the state-adopted provisions of
the national electric safety code. It further recognizes that preparation
for and response to wildfire risk is an increasingly important element of
planning conducted by electric utilities. Proper preparation is crucial to
position electric utilities to avoid and respond to wildfire risk. Knowing
what measures should be taken to minimize wildfire risk before a fire occurs
and to respond to it when it does occur is central to the affordable, safe,
and reliable transmission and distribution of electricity. It is essential
to ensure these risks are addressed as needed and within appropriate cost
parameters so that electric power is kept affordable to the public. This
chapter is designed to direct the prudent use of resources by electric util-
ities to mitigate and respond to wildfire risk within the costs that can be
justified as just and reasonable in order to keep rates affordable to utility
customers and protect Idaho residents and their property.
61-1803. WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLANS. (1) For the purposes of this chap-
ter, "commission" means the Idaho public utilities commission.
(2)(a) Each electric corporation that is a public utility as defined
in sections 61-119 and 61-129, Idaho Code, shall adopt and file a wild-
fire mitigation plan with the commission for its review and approval


pursuant to section 61-1804, Idaho Code. The commission may order the
plans be filed at a date determined by it and may stagger filing dates.
(b) An electric corporation that is not a public utility, including but
not limited to a cooperative association distributing electric power to
its members or a municipal electric distribution system under section
50-342, Idaho Code, may adopt and file a wildfire mitigation plan with
the commission for its review at any time permitted by the commission.
If such a plan is filed, the commission may assess reasonable fees to the
electrical corporation that is not a public utility for its review. The
fee may not exceed the actual reasonable cost incurred by the commission
for the review and consideration of a plan submitted to it.
(3) Each wildfire mitigation plan shall be developed using approaches
and methods that are designed to protect the public interest and are reflec-
tive of and commensurate with the size and complexity of the electric corpo-
ration's operations and of the nature of the fire risk. At a minimum, each
wildfire mitigation plan shall identify a means for mitigating wildfire risk
that reflect a reasonable balancing of mitigation costs with the resulting
reduction of wildfire risk, including:
(a) Identifying geographical areas where an electric corporation has
infrastructure or equipment that the electric corporation considers
may be subject to a heightened risk of wildfire at the time the wildfire
mitigation plan is finalized by the electric corporation;
(b) Preventative actions and programs that the electric corporation
will carry out to reduce the risk of wildfire;
(c) Community outreach and public awareness efforts that the electric
corporation will use before, during, and after wildfire season to iden-
tify and inform the public of relevant wildfire risks and notify the
public of wildfire-related outages;
(d) Outreach efforts to coordinate with federal, state, tribal, and lo-
cal officials and agencies on wildfire preparedness and emergency re-
sponse plans;
(e) Financially prudent and reasonably practicable methods of line de-
sign for new, planned, and existing lines to mitigate fire risk;
(f) Monitoring of forecasted and current weather data for the purpose
of assessing and responding to current and anticipated fire risk; and
(g) Developing standards, procedures, and schedules, subject to timely
approval of access to rights-of-way, if necessary, for the following
actions:
(i) Inspection of the electric corporation's assets, infra-
structure, and facilities within the areas that are identified as
heightened fire risk areas in the wildfire mitigation plan, where
financially prudent and reasonably practicable;
(ii) De-energization of the electric corporation's power lines,
if considered appropriate by the electric corporation; and
(iii) Vegetation management within the areas that are identified
as heightened fire risk areas in the wildfire mitigation plan
and are within the electric corporation's rights-of-way or lands
adjacent thereto and that threaten the power lines or other elec-
tric corporation infrastructure. If live marketable timber is
identified for removal from timber company land adjacent to the


rights-of-way, compensation at fair market value shall be made to
the landowner for such timber.
(4) Commission-approved wildfire mitigation plans shall be imple-
mented upon approval by the commission and shall be reviewed and updated
annually. The plans shall be updated, publicly filed, and approved in accor-
dance with this section and section 61-1804, Idaho Code.
(5) An electric corporation with a commission-approved wildfire miti-
gation plan shall submit a report to the commission updating the commission
on the electric corporation's compliance with its wildfire mitigation plan
on an annual basis or on such other basis as the commission may prescribe by
rule or order. The report shall include documentation describing the devel-
opment and adoption of the wildfire mitigation plan's components and mea-
sures, the wildfire mitigation expenditures, and the work taken to develop
and adopt the plan's components and measures.
61-1804. COMMISSION REVIEW OF WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLANS. (1) The com-
mission shall review a wildfire mitigation plan or an update thereto and, af-
ter notice and comment, within six (6) months of receiving such filing, shall
approve or reject the plan. In reviewing the plan, the commission shall en-
sure that it meets the minimum requirements stated in section 61-1803, Idaho
Code, and shall consider the following factors:
(a) The consistency of the plan with the public health, safety, and wel-
fare;
(b) The feasibility of the plan and the cost of its implementation; and
(c) The degree to which the plan adequately minimizes wildfire risk and
proposes to respond to wildfires that do occur.
(2) Within five (5) business days of filing a wildfire mitigation plan
with the commission for its review and approval, the electric corporation
shall provide notice of the filing to the state forester, cities, counties,
fire protection districts, fire protection associations, and timber protec-
tion associations within the electric corporation's Idaho service area. No-
tice may be given by certified mail or electronic means.
(3) In reviewing a plan, the commission shall consult with the inter-
ested entities listed in subsection (2) of this section for technical assis-
tance. With respect to elements of the plan that relate to vegetation man-
agement, reduction of wildfire fuels, and other duties of the state forester
under title 38, Idaho Code, it shall be presumed that the recommendations
of the state forester, if any are provided, are reasonable and appropriate.
Such recommendations shall be incorporated in the decision of the commission
unless the commission determines they are not just, reasonable, and in the
public interest, in which case the commission shall document its reasoning
in its order approving or rejecting the plan.
61-1805. EFFECT OF WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLANS. A commission-approved
plan shall establish measures for the electric corporation to prepare for
and address wildfire risk and shall establish the electric corporation's
duty to its members and the public.
61-1806. LIABILITY. (1) In a civil action where wildfire-related
damages are being sought against an electric corporation, there is a rebut-


table presumption that the electric corporation acted without negligence
if, with respect to the cause of the wildfire, the electric corporation rea-
sonably implemented a commission-approved wildfire mitigation plan. This
rebuttable presumption extends to any act or omission taken in reasonable
accordance with the approved wildfire mitigation plan in effect at the time
the fire ignited, regardless of the content in any prior commission-approved
plan that is no longer in effect.
(2) If an electric corporation is found liable in a civil action for
damages due to any unplanned or uncontrolled fire, then a plaintiff seeking
damages in such civil action may recover damages as provided for in sections
38-107(2), 6-1603, and 6-1604, Idaho Code, subject to the limitations pro-
vided therein.
61-1807. DENIAL OF ACCESS TO RIGHTS-OF-WAY. If, after an electric
corporation has requested access to privately-owned land or an easement
or right-of-way on land owned by the state, a federal agency, or a tribal
government, through certified mail addressed to the address best calcu-
lated to provide notice, telephone, or electronic means known to belong to
the landowner, state, federal agency, or tribal government and reasonably
considered likely to provide notice, access is denied or no response is re-
ceived after thirty (30) days of the request, the electric corporation is
authorized to access the property, easement, or right-of-way for the limited
purposes of performing vegetation management, fire mitigation work in ac-
cordance with a commission-approved wildfire mitigation plan, or upgrading,
inspecting, or repairing the electric corporation's assets, infrastruc-
ture, or facilities. In taking such actions, the electric corporation shall
not be held liable in any civil action for claims or damages, except to the
extent the electric corporation's conduct willfully or recklessly caused
substantial damage to the property.
61-1808. EXCLUSIVE REMEDY. Except to the extent title 72, Idaho Code,
is applicable, the civil actions identified in section 61-1806, Idaho Code,
shall be the exclusive civil remedies available against an electric corpo-
ration for damages resulting from any act or omission related to a commis-
sion-approved wildfire mitigation plan. This section does not limit an in-
surer's ability to exercise valid subrogation rights subject to the liabil-
ity framework established in section 61-1806, Idaho Code. This section does
not limit or impair any action that may be brought against the manufacturer
of any equipment that is alleged to be faulty or defective.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.